Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2281.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-37.1-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37.1 entitled "Sexual
Offender Registration and Community Notification" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37.1-10. Penalties.
(a) Any person who is required to register or verify his or her the person's address or give
notice of a change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be guilty of a felony
and, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than ten (10) years, or fined not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(b) Any person who is required to register or verify his or her the person's address or give
notice of a change of address or residence who knowingly fails to do so shall be in violation of the
terms of his or her the person's release, regardless of whether or not the term was a special condition
of his or her the person's release on probation, parole, home confinement or other form of
supervised release.
(c) Except in the case of a level-three (3) sex offender, any Any person who is required to
register or verify his or her the person's address, who knowingly resides within three hundred feet
(300′) of any school as defined in § 11-37.1-2, which distance shall be measured from the nearest
boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary
line of the real property that supports or upon which there exists a school in a straight line, without
regard for intervening structures or objects, from the nearest portion of the property on which the

person subject to this section resides, to the nearest property line of the premises of any school shall
be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned not more than five (5) years, or fined
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(d) Any level-three (3) sex offender who knowingly resides within one thousand feet
(1,000′) of any school as defined in § 11-37.1-2, which distance shall be measured from the nearest
boundary line of the real property supporting the residence of the person to the nearest boundary
line of the real property that supports or upon which there exists a school shall be guilty of a felony
and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004363
========
LC004363 - Page 2 of 3